test/src/morphology/N-имя_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - имя M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      имя+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: и́мя
      имя+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: и́мя
      имя+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: и́мени
      имя+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: и́мени
      имя+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: и́мени
      имя+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: и́менем
      имя+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: имена́
      имя+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: имена́
      имя+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: имён
      имя+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: имена́х
      имя+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: имена́м
      имя+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: имена́ми
